District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.13

Approval of entity transaction by limited cooperative association.

(a)

For a limited cooperative association to approve an entity transaction under subchapter XV of this chapter or Chapter 2 of this title, a plan must be approved by a majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the organic rules, and the board of directors must call a members meeting to consider the plan, hold the meeting not later than 90 days after approval of the plan by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

(1)

The plan, or a summary of the plan and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the plan in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

(2)

A recommendation that the members approve the plan, or if the board determines that because of a conflict of interest or other circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

(3)

A statement of any condition of the board’s submission of the plan to the members; and

(4)

Notice of the meeting at which the plan will be considered, which must be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

(b)

Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a plan must be approved by:

(1)

At least two-thirds of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under subsection (a) of this section; and

(2)

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

(c)

The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under subsection (b)(1) of this section is:

(1)

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

(2)

Measured against the voting power of all members; or “(3) A combination of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.

(d)

The vote required to approve a plan may not be less than the vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend the articles of organization.

(e)

Consent in a record to a plan by a member must be delivered to the limited cooperative association before delivery to the Mayor for filing of articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication, if, as a result of the merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication, the member will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, or other liabilities that arise after the transaction becomes effective.

(f)

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under § 29-1004.04 apply to the approval of a transaction under this title.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(2)(C), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.